Utah statutes.
17-16-7.   Deputies and employees -- Appointments -- County legislative body
consent power -- Liability of principal -- Deputy may serve despite vacancy in
office of appointing officer.
(1) (a)  A county or precinct officer, including an elected county executive,
except a county commissioner or county council member, may, with the consent
of the county legislative body, appoint deputies and employees as necessary
for the discharge of the duties of the officer's office.
(b)  The county legislative body's consent power under Subsection (1)(a) shall
be defined in county ordinance and may include consent by:
(i)  the budget approval process;
(ii)  approval of an allocation of a certain number of positions; or
(iii)  approval or disapproval of the hiring of individual applicants.
(c)  A county legislative body may by ordinance delegate to the county
executive the authority to consent to the appointment of deputies and
employees under this Subsection (1).
(2) If the county clerk performs district court clerk functions, the
legislative body of that county shall provide the clerk with deputies and
employees for the business of the district courts as considered necessary and
advisable by the judge or judges of the district court, consistent with the
level of funding for clerk services from the court administrator's office.
(3) (a)  Each officer appointing a deputy shall, for each deputy appointed,
file a signed writing with the county clerk that memorializes the appointment.
(b)  The officer appointing the deputy is liable for all official acts of the
deputy.
(c)  If the office of the officer who appointed the deputy becomes vacant, the
deputy may continue to serve despite the vacancy.
